District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.14

Hardship exemption.

The Mayor shall exempt, by rule, businesses that can prove hardship as a result of this chapter. The Mayor shall submit the proposed hardship exemption rules to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sunday, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 15, 55 DCR 3452